Missouri, session 2026, HB2335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 160.261, 160.263, 160.485, 160.775, 162.065, 162.069, 167.625,
167.950, 170.047, 170.048, and 170.315, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.261, 160.263, 160.485, 160.775, 162.065,
162.069, 167.625, 167.950, 168.331, 170.047, 170.048, and 170.315, to read as follows:
160.261. 1. (1) The local board of education of each school district shall clearly
establish a written policy of discipline, including the district's determination on the use of
corporal punishment and the procedures in which punishment will be applied. A written copy
of the district's discipline policy and corporal punishment procedures, if applicable, shall be
provided to the pupil and parent or legal guardian of every pupil enrolled in the district at the
beginning of each school year and also made available in the office of the superintendent of
such district, during normal business hours, for public inspection. No pupil shall be subject to
corporal punishment procedures outlined in the discipline and corporal punishment policy
without a parent or guardian being notified and providing written permission for the corporal
punishment.
(2) All employees of the district shall [annually] receive instruction related to the
specific contents of the policy of discipline and any interpretations necessary to implement
the provisions of the policy in the course of their duties, including but not limited to approved
methods of dealing with acts of school violence, disciplining students with disabilities and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2335 2
instruction in the necessity and requirements for confidentiality. Such instruction shall be
provided as established in section 168.331.
2. (1) The policy shall require school administrators to report acts of school violence
to all teachers at the attendance center and, in addition, to other school district employees with
a need to know.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter or chapter 167, "need to know" is defined as
school personnel who are directly responsible for the student's education or who otherwise
interact with the student on a professional basis while acting within the scope of their
assigned duties. As used in this section, the phrase "act of school violence" or "violent
behavior" means the exertion of physical force by a student with the intent to do serious
physical injury as defined in section 556.061 to another person while on school property,
including a school bus in service on behalf of the district, or while involved in school
activities.
(3) The policy shall at a minimum require school administrators to report, as soon as
reasonably [practical] practicable, to the appropriate law enforcement agency any of the
following crimes, or any act which if committed by an adult would be one of the following
crimes, committed on school property including, but not limited to, actions on any school
bus in service on behalf of the district or while involved in school activities:
[(1)] (a) First degree murder under section 565.020;
[(2)] (b) Second degree murder under section 565.021;
[(3)] (c) Kidnapping under section 565.110 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110;
[(4)] (d) First degree assault under section 565.050;
[(5)] (e) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
[(6)] (f) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
[(7)] (g) Burglary in the first degree under section 569.160;
[(8)] (h) Burglary in the second degree under section 569.170;
[(9)] (i) Robbery in the first degree under section 569.020 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, or robbery in the first degree under section 570.023;
[(10)] (j) Distribution of drugs under section 195.211 as it existed prior to January 1,
2017, or manufacture of a controlled substance under section 579.055;
[(11)] (k) Distribution of drugs to a minor under section 195.212 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, or delivery of a controlled substance under section 579.020;
[(12)] (l) Arson in the first degree under section 569.040;
[(13)] (m) Voluntary manslaughter under section 565.023;

HCS HB 2335 3
[(14)] (n) Involuntary manslaughter under section 565.024 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, involuntary manslaughter in the first degree under section 565.024, or
involuntary manslaughter in the second degree under section 565.027;
[(15)] (o) Second degree assault under section 565.060 as it existed prior to January 1,
2017, or second degree assault under section 565.052;
[(16)] (p) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
[(17)] (q) Felonious restraint under section 565.120 as it existed prior to January 1,
2017, or kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120;
[(18)] (r) Property damage in the first degree under section 569.100;
[(19)] (s) The possession of a weapon under chapter 571;
[(20)] (t) Child molestation in the first degree pursuant to section 566.067 as it
existed prior to January 1, 2017, or child molestation in the first, second, or third degree
pursuant to section 566.067, 566.068, or 566.069;
[(21)] (u) Sodomy in the second degree pursuant to section 566.061;
[(22)] (v) Sexual misconduct involving a child pursuant to section 566.083;
[(23)] (w) Sexual abuse in the first degree pursuant to section 566.100;
[(24)] (x) Harassment under section 565.090 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
harassment in the first degree under section 565.090; or
[(25)] (y) Stalking under section 565.225 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
stalking in the first degree under section 565.225[;].

[committed on school property, including but not limited to actions on any school bus in
service on behalf of the district or while involved in school activities.]
(4) The policy shall require that any portion of a student's individualized education
program that is related to demonstrated or potentially violent behavior shall be provided to
any teacher and other school district employees who are directly responsible for the student's
education or who otherwise interact with the student on an educational basis while acting
within the scope of [their] such teacher's or employees' assigned duties.
(5) The policy shall also contain the consequences of failure to obey standards of
conduct set by the local board of education, and the importance of the standards to the
maintenance of an atmosphere where orderly learning is possible and encouraged.
3. The policy shall provide that any student who is on suspension for any of the
offenses listed in subsection 2 of this section or any act of violence or drug-related activity
defined by school district policy as a serious violation of school discipline pursuant to
subsection 9 of this section shall have as a condition of his or her suspension the requirement
that such student is not allowed, while on such suspension, to be within one thousand feet of

HCS HB 2335 4
any school property in the school district where such student attended school or any activity
of that district, regardless of whether or not the activity takes place on district property unless:
(1) Such student is under the direct supervision of the student's parent, legal guardian,
or custodian and the superintendent or the superintendent's designee has authorized the
student to be on school property;
(2) Such student is under the direct supervision of another adult designated by the
student's parent, legal guardian, or custodian, in advance, in writing, to the principal of the
school which suspended the student and the superintendent or the superintendent's designee
has authorized the student to be on school property;
(3) Such student is enrolled in and attending an alternative school that is located
within one thousand feet of a public school in the school district where such student attended
school; or
(4) Such student resides within one thousand feet of any public school in the school
district where such student attended school in which case such student may be on the property
100 of his or her residence without direct adult supervision.
101 4. Any student who violates the condition of suspension required pursuant to
102 subsection 3 of this section may be subject to expulsion or further suspension pursuant to the
103 provisions of sections 167.161, 167.164, and 167.171. In making this determination
104 consideration shall be given to whether the student poses a threat to the safety of any child or
105 school employee and whether such student's unsupervised presence within one thousand feet
106 of the school is disruptive to the educational process or undermines the effectiveness of the
107 school's disciplinary policy. Removal of any pupil who is a student with a disability is subject
108 to state and federal procedural rights. This section shall not limit a school district's ability to:
109 (1) Prohibit all students who are suspended from being on school property or
110 attending an activity while on suspension;
111 (2) Discipline students for off-campus conduct that negatively affects the educational
112 environment to the extent allowed by law.
113 5. The policy shall provide for a suspension for a period of not less than one year, or
114 expulsion, for a student who is determined to have brought a weapon to school, including but
115 not limited to the school playground or the school parking lot, brought a weapon on a school
116 bus or brought a weapon to a school activity whether on or off of the school property in
117 violation of district policy, except that:
118 (1) The superintendent or, in a school district with no high school, the principal of the
119 school which such child attends may modify such suspension on a case-by-case basis; and
120 (2) This section shall not prevent the school district from providing educational
121 services in an alternative setting to a student suspended under the provisions of this section.

HCS HB 2335 5
122 6. For the purpose of this section, the term "weapon" shall mean a firearm as defined
123 under 18 U.S.C. Section 921 and the following items, as defined in section 571.010: a
124 blackjack, a concealable firearm, an explosive weapon, a firearm, a firearm silencer, a gas
125 gun, a knife, knuckles, a machine gun, a projectile weapon, a rifle, a shotgun, a spring gun or
126 a switchblade knife; except that this section shall not be construed to prohibit a school board
127 from adopting a policy to allow a Civil War reenactor to carry a Civil War era weapon on
128 school property for educational purposes so long as the firearm is unloaded. The local board
129 of education shall define weapon in the discipline policy. Such definition shall include the
130 weapons defined in this subsection but may also include other weapons.
131 7. All school district personnel responsible for the care and supervision of students
132 are authorized to hold every pupil strictly accountable for any disorderly conduct in school or
133 on any property of the school, on any school bus going to or returning from school, during
134 school-sponsored activities, or during intermission or recess periods.
135 8. Teachers and other authorized district personnel in public schools responsible for
136 the care, supervision, and discipline of schoolchildren, including volunteers selected with
137 reasonable care by the school district, shall not be civilly liable when acting in conformity
138 with the established policies developed by each board, including but not limited to policies of
139 student discipline or when reporting to his or her supervisor or other person as mandated by
140 state law acts of school violence or threatened acts of school violence, within the course and
141 scope of the duties of the teacher, authorized district personnel or volunteer, when such
142 individual is acting in conformity with the established policies developed by the board.
143 Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a new cause of action against such school
144 district, or to relieve the school district from liability for the negligent acts of such persons.
145 9. Each school board shall define in its discipline policy acts of violence and any
146 other acts that constitute a serious violation of that policy. "Acts of violence" as defined by
147 school boards shall include but not be limited to exertion of physical force by a student with
148 the intent to do serious bodily harm to another person while on school property, including a
149 school bus in service on behalf of the district, or while involved in school activities. School
150 districts shall for each student enrolled in the school district compile and maintain records of
151 any serious violation of the district's discipline policy. Such records shall be made available
152 to teachers and other school district employees with a need to know while acting within the
153 scope of their assigned duties, and shall be provided as required in section 167.020 to any
154 school district in which the student subsequently attempts to enroll.
155 10. Spanking, when administered by certificated personnel and in the presence of a
156 witness who is an employee of the school district, or the use of reasonable force to protect
157 persons or property, when administered by personnel of a school district in a reasonable

HCS HB 2335 6
158 manner in accordance with the local board of education's written policy of discipline, is not
159 abuse within the meaning of chapter 210.
160 11. Upon receipt of any reports of child abuse by the children's division pursuant to
161 sections 210.110 to 210.165 which allegedly involve personnel of a school district, the
162 children's division shall notify the superintendent of schools of the district or, if the person
163 named in the alleged incident is the superintendent of schools, the president of the school
164 board of the school district where the alleged incident occurred.
165 12. In order to ensure the safety of all students, should a student be expelled for
166 bringing a weapon to school, violent behavior, or for an act of school violence, that student
167 shall not, for the purposes of the accreditation process of the Missouri school improvement
168 plan, be considered a dropout or be included in the calculation of that district's educational
169 persistence ratio.
160.263. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Mechanical restraint", the use of any device or equipment to restrict a student's
freedom of movement. Mechanical restraint shall not include devices implemented by trained
personnel or used by a student with a prescription for such devices from an appropriate
medical or related services professional and that are used for specific and approved purposes
for which such devices were designed, such as the following:
(a) Adaptive devices or mechanical supports used to achieve proper body position,
balance, or alignment to allow greater freedom of mobility than would be possible without the
use of such devices or mechanical supports;
(b) Vehicle safety restraints when used as intended during the transport of a student in
a moving vehicle;
(c) Restraints for medical immobilization; or
(d) Orthopedically prescribed devices that permit a student to participate in activities
without risk;
(2) "Physical restraint", a personal restriction such as person-to-person physical
contact that immobilizes, reduces, or restricts the ability of a student to move the student's
torso, arms, legs, or head freely. Physical restraint shall not include:
(a) A physical escort, which is a temporary touching or holding of the hand, wrist,
arm, shoulder, or back for the purpose of inducing a student to walk to a safe location;
(b) Comforting or calming a student;
(c) Holding a student's hand to transport the student for safety purposes;
(d) Intervening in a fight; or
(e) Using an assistive or protective device prescribed by an appropriately trained
professional or professional team;

HCS HB 2335 7
(3) "Prone restraint", using mechanical or physical restraint or both to restrict a
student's movement while the student is lying with the student's front or face downward;
(4) "Restraint" includes, but is not limited to, mechanical restraint, physical restraint,
and prone restraint;
(5) "Seclusion", the involuntary confinement of a student alone in a room or area that
the student is physically prevented from leaving and that complies with the building code in
effect in the school district. Seclusion shall not include the following:
(a) A timeout, which is a behavior management technique that is part of an approved
program, involves the monitored separation of the student in a nonlocked setting, and is
implemented for the purpose of calming;
(b) In-school suspension;
(c) Detention; or
(d) Other appropriate disciplinary measures.
2. The school discipline policy under section 160.261 shall reserve confining a
student in seclusion for situations or conditions in which there is imminent danger of physical
harm to self or others.
3. For all school years beginning on or after July 1, 2022, no school district, charter
school, or publicly contracted private provider shall use any mechanical, physical, or prone
restraint technique that:
(1) Obstructs views of the student's face;
(2) Obstructs the student's respiratory airway, impairs the student's breathing or
respiratory capacity, or restricts the movement required for normal breathing to cause
positional or postural asphyxia;
(3) Places pressure or weight on or causes the compression of the student's chest,
lungs, sternum, diaphragm, back, abdomen, or genitals;
(4) Obstructs the student's circulation of blood;
(5) Involves pushing on or into the student's mouth, nose, eyes, or any part of the face
or involves covering the face or body with anything including, but not limited to, soft objects
such as pillows, blankets, or washcloths;
(6) Endangers the student's life or significantly exacerbates the student's medical
condition;
(7) Is purposely designed to inflict pain;
(8) Restricts the student from communicating. If an employee physically restrains a
student who uses sign language or an augmentative mode of communication as the student's
primary mode of communication, the student shall be permitted to have the student's hands
free of restraint for brief periods unless an employee determines that such freedom appears
likely to result in harm to self or others.

HCS HB 2335 8
4. (1) By July 1, 2011, the local board of education of each school district shall adopt
a written policy that comprehensively addresses the use of restrictive behavioral interventions
as a form of discipline or behavior management technique. The policy shall be consistent
with professionally accepted practices and standards of student discipline, behavior
management, health and safety, including the safe schools act. The policy shall include
but not be limited to:
(a) Definitions of restraint, seclusion, and time-out and any other terminology
necessary to describe the continuum of restrictive behavioral interventions available for use
or prohibited in the district, consistent with the provisions of this section;
(b) Description of circumstances under which a restrictive behavioral intervention is
allowed and prohibited, consistent with the provisions of this section, and any unique
application requirements for specific groups of students such as differences based on age,
disability, or environment in which the educational services are provided;
(c) Specific implementation requirements associated with a restrictive behavioral
intervention such as time limits, facility specifications, training requirements or supervision
requirements; and
(d) Documentation, notice and permission requirements associated with use of a
restrictive behavioral intervention.
(2) Before July 1, 2022, each written policy adopted under this subsection shall be
updated to prohibit the school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private provider
from using any restraint that employs any technique listed in subsection 3 of this section.
(3) Before July 1, 2022, each written policy adopted under this subsection shall be
updated to state that the school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private provider
will reserve restraint or seclusion for situations or conditions in which there is imminent
danger of physical harm to self or others.
5. Before July 1, 2022, each school district, charter school, and publicly contracted
private provider shall ensure that the policy adopted under subsection 4 of this section
requires the following:
(1) Any student placed in seclusion or restraint shall be removed from such seclusion
or restraint as soon as the school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private
provider determines that the student is no longer an imminent danger of physical harm to self
or others;
(2) All school district, charter school, and publicly contracted private provider
personnel shall annually review the policy and procedures involving the use of seclusion and
restraint. Personnel who use seclusion or restraint shall [annually] complete mandatory
training in the specific seclusion and restraint techniques the school district, charter school, or

HCS HB 2335 9
publicly contracted private provider uses under this section. Such training shall be
provided as established in section 168.331;
100 (3) (a) Each time seclusion or restraint is used for a student, the incident shall be
101 monitored by a member of the school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private
102 provider personnel, and a report shall be completed by the school district, charter school, or
103 publicly contracted private provider that contains, at a minimum, the following:
104 a. The date, time of day, location, duration, and description of the incident and
105 interventions;
106 b. Any event leading to the incident and the reason for using seclusion or restraint;
107 c. A description of the methods of seclusion or restraint used;
108 d. The nature and extent of any injury to the student;
109 e. The names, roles, and certifications of each employee involved in the use of
110 seclusion or restraint;
111 f. The name, role, and signature of the person who prepared the report;
112 g. The name of an employee whom the parent or guardian can contact regarding the
113 incident and use of seclusion or restraint;
114 h. The name of an employee to contact if the parent or guardian wishes to file a
115 complaint; and
116 i. A statement directing parents and legal guardians to a sociological, emotional, or
117 behavioral support organization and a hotline number to report child abuse and neglect.
118 (b) The school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private provider shall
119 maintain the report as an education record of the student, provide a copy to the parent or legal
120 guardian within five school days, and a copy of each incident report shall be given to the
121 department of elementary and secondary education within thirty days of the incident;
122 (4) The school district, charter school, or publicly contracted private provider shall
123 attempt to notify the parents or legal guardians as soon as possible but no later than one hour
124 after the end of the school day on which the use of seclusion or restraint occurred.
125 Notification shall be oral or electronic and shall include a statement indicating that the school
126 district, charter school, or publicly contracted private provider will provide the parents or
127 legal guardians a copy of the report described in subdivision (3) of this subsection within five
128 school days;
129 (5) An officer, administrator, or employee of a public school district or charter school
130 shall not retaliate against any person for having:
131 (a) Reported a violation of any policy established under this section or failure of a
132 district or charter school to follow any provisions of this section in relation to incidents of
133 seclusion and restraint; or

HCS HB 2335 10
134 (b) Provided information regarding a violation of this section by a public school
135 district or charter school or a member of the staff of the public school district or charter
136 school.
137 6. The department of elementary and secondary education shall compile and maintain
138 all incidents reported under this section in the department's core data system and make such
139 data available on the Missouri comprehensive data system. No personally identifiable data
140 shall be accessible on the database.
141 7. The department of elementary and secondary education shall, in cooperation with
142 appropriate associations, organizations, agencies and individuals with specialized expertise in
143 behavior management, develop a model policy that satisfies the requirements of subsection 2
144 of this section as it existed on August 28, 2009, by July 1, 2010, and shall update such model
145 policy to include the requirements of subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection 4 and subsection 5
146 of this section by July 1, 2022.
160.485. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Stop the Bleed
Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Bleeding control kit", a first aid response kit that contains at least the following:
(a) Tourniquets that are:
a. Endorsed by the United States Department of Defense Committee on Tactical
Combat Casualty Care or its successor entity; or
b. Approved for use in battlefield trauma care by the Armed Forces of the United
States;
(b) Bleeding control bandages;
(c) Latex-free protective gloves;
(d) Permanent markers;
(e) Instructional documents developed by the United States Department of Homeland
Security's Stop the Bleed national awareness campaign or the American College of Surgeons
Committee on Trauma, or both; and
(f) Other medical materials and equipment similar to those described in paragraphs
(a) and (b) of this subdivision;
(2) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
(3) "Emergency medical services personnel", paid or volunteer firefighters, law
enforcement officers, first responders, emergency medical technicians, or other emergency
service personnel acting within the ordinary course and scope of those professions, but
excluding physicians;

HCS HB 2335 11
(4) "School personnel", any employee of a public school district or charter school, or
any volunteer serving at a public school or charter school, who is designated to use a bleeding
control kit under this section.
3. (1) Before January 1, 2026, the department shall develop a traumatic blood loss
protocol for school personnel to follow in the event of an injury involving traumatic blood
loss. The protocol shall meet the requirements of this section and shall be made available to
each school district and charter school.
(2) The traumatic blood loss protocol shall:
(a) Require that a bleeding control kit be placed in areas where there is likely to be
high traffic or congregation, such as auditoriums, cafeterias, or gymnasiums, and areas where
risk of injury may be elevated, including vocational classes such as woodworking or
automotive classes, in each school district's school buildings and each charter school in an
easily accessible location of such areas to be determined by local emergency medical services
personnel;
(b) Include bleeding control kits in the emergency plans of each school district and
charter school, including the presentation and use of the bleeding control kits in all drills and
emergencies;
(c) Require each school district and charter school to designate in each school
building a school nurse or school health care provider or, if no school nurse or school health
care provider is available, a school personnel member, who shall obtain appropriate training
[annually] as established in section 168.331in the use of a bleeding control kit including, but
not limited to:
a. The proper application of pressure to stop bleeding;
b. The proper application of dressings or bandages;
c. Additional pressure techniques to control bleeding; and
d. The correct application of tourniquets;
(d) Require each bleeding control kit in school inventories to be inspected annually to
ensure that the materials, supplies, and equipment contained in the bleeding control kit have
not expired and that any expired materials, supplies, and equipment are replaced as necessary;
and
(e) Require a bleeding control kit to be restocked after each use and any materials,
supplies, and equipment to be replaced as necessary to ensure that the bleeding control kit
contains all necessary materials, supplies, and equipment.
4. (1) The department shall, in collaboration with the United States Department of
Homeland Security and the state department of public safety, include requirements in the
traumatic blood loss protocol for school personnel to receive [annual] training as established
in section 168.331 in the use of bleeding control kits.

HCS HB 2335 12
(2) The training requirements shall be satisfied by successful completion and
certification under the "STOP THE BLEED" course as promulgated by the American College
of Surgeons Committee on Trauma or the American Red Cross.
(3) The training requirements may allow online instruction.
5. (1) A bleeding control kit may contain any additional items that:
(a) Are approved by emergency medical services personnel, as such term is defined in
section 190.600;
(b) Can adequately treat an injury involving traumatic blood loss; and
(c) Can be stored in a readily available kit.
(2) Quantities of each item required to be in a bleeding control kit may be determined
by each school district.
6. (1) The department and each school district and charter school shall maintain
information regarding the traumatic blood loss protocol and the Stop the Bleed national
awareness campaign on each entity's website.
(2) Upon request by a school district or a charter school, the department may, in
collaboration with the department of public safety, direct the school district or charter school
to resources that are available to provide bleeding control kits to the school district or charter
school.
7. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each school district and
charter school shall implement the traumatic blood loss protocol developed under this section
before the end of the 2025-26 school year.
(2) The requirements that a bleeding control kit be placed as required in paragraph (a)
of subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section, that each kit be restocked as necessary, and
that school personnel receive training under this section shall be subject to an appropriation
by the general assembly to cover all costs related to such requirements.
(3) Any school district or charter school may receive donations of funds for the
purchase of bleeding control kits that meet the requirements of this section and may receive
donations of bleeding control kits that meet the requirements of this section.
8. This section shall not be construed to create a cause of action against a school
district, a charter school, or any school personnel. Any school personnel who in good faith
use a bleeding control kit as provided by this section shall be immune from all civil liability
for any act or omission in the use of a bleeding control kit unless the act or omission
constitutes gross negligence or willful, wanton, or intentional misconduct.
160.775. 1. Every district shall adopt an antibullying policy by September 1, 2007.
2. "Bullying" means intimidation, unwanted aggressive behavior, or harassment that
is repetitive or is substantially likely to be repeated and causes a reasonable student to fear for
his or her physical safety or property; substantially interferes with the educational

HCS HB 2335 13
performance, opportunities, or benefits of any student without exception; or substantially
disrupts the orderly operation of the school. Bullying may consist of physical actions,
including gestures, or oral, cyberbullying, electronic, or written communication, and any
threat of retaliation for reporting of such acts. Bullying of students is prohibited on school
property, at any school function, or on a school bus. "Cyberbullying" means bullying as
defined in this subsection through the transmission of a communication including, but not
limited to, a message, text, sound, or image by means of an electronic device including, but
not limited to, a telephone, wireless telephone, or other wireless communication device,
computer, or pager.
3. Each district's antibullying policy shall be founded on the assumption that all
students need a safe learning environment. Policies shall treat all students equally and shall
not contain specific lists of protected classes of students who are to receive special treatment.
Policies may include age-appropriate differences for schools based on the grade levels at the
school. Each such policy shall contain a statement of the consequences of bullying.
4. Each district's antibullying policy shall be included in the student handbook and
shall require, at a minimum, the following components:
(1) A statement prohibiting bullying, defined no less inclusively than in subsection 2
of this section;
(2) A statement requiring district employees to report any instance of bullying of
which the employee has firsthand knowledge. The policy shall require a district employee
who witnesses an incident of bullying to report the incident to the district's designated
individual at the school within two school days of the employee witnessing the incident;
(3) A procedure for reporting an act of bullying. The policy shall also include a
statement requiring that the district designate an individual at each school in the district to
receive reports of incidents of bullying. Such individual shall be a district employee who is
teacher level staff or above;
(4) A procedure for prompt investigation of reports of violations and complaints,
identifying one or more employees responsible for the investigation including, at a minimum,
the following requirements:
(a) Within two school days of a report of an incident of bullying being received, the
school principal, or his or her designee, shall initiate an investigation of the incident;
(b) The school principal may appoint other school staff to assist with the
investigation; and
(c) The investigation shall be completed within ten school days from the date of the
written report unless good cause exists to extend the investigation;

HCS HB 2335 14
(5) A statement that prohibits reprisal or retaliation against any person who reports an
act of bullying and the consequence and appropriate remedial action for a person who
engages in reprisal or retaliation;
(6) A statement of how the policy is to be publicized; and
(7) A process for discussing the district's antibullying policy with students and
training school employees and volunteers who have significant contact with students in the
requirements of the policy, including, at a minimum, the following statements:
(a) The school district shall provide information and appropriate training to the school
district staff who have significant contact with students regarding the policy. Such training
shall be provided as established in section 168.331;
(b) The school district shall give annual notice of the policy to students, parents or
guardians, and staff;
(c) The school district shall provide education and information to students regarding
bullying, including information regarding the school district policy prohibiting bullying, the
harmful effects of bullying, and other applicable initiatives to address bullying, including
student peer-to-peer initiatives to provide accountability and policy enforcement for those
found to have engaged in bullying, reprisal, or retaliation against any person who reports an
act of bullying;
(d) The administration of the school district shall instruct its school counselors,
school social workers, licensed social workers, mental health professionals, and school
psychologists to educate students who are victims of bullying on techniques for students to
overcome bullying's negative effects. Such techniques shall include, but not be limited to,
cultivating the student's self-worth and self-esteem; teaching the student to defend himself or
herself assertively and effectively; helping the student develop social skills; or encouraging
the student to develop an internal locus of control. The provisions of this paragraph shall not
be construed to contradict or limit any other provision of this section; and
(e) The administration of the school district shall implement programs and other
initiatives to address bullying, to respond to such conduct in a manner that does not stigmatize
the victim, and to make resources or referrals available to victims of bullying.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any school district shall
have jurisdiction to prohibit cyberbullying that originates on a school's campus or at a district
activity if the electronic communication was made using the school's technological resources,
if there is a sufficient nexus to the educational environment, or if the electronic
communication was made on the school's campus or at a district activity using the
student's own personal technological resources. The school district may discipline any
student for such cyberbullying to the greatest extent allowed by law.

HCS HB 2335 15
6. Each district shall review its antibullying policy and revise it as needed. The
district's school board shall receive input from school personnel, students, and administrators
when reviewing and revising the policy.
162.065. On an annual basis, each school district shall provide training in at least
[eight] four hours of duration to each school bus driver employed by the school district or
under contract with the school district. Such training shall provide special instruction in
school bus driving.
162.069. 1. Every school district shall, by March 1, 2012, promulgate a written
policy concerning employee-student communication. The governing body of each charter
school shall adopt a written policy concerning employee-student communication by January
1, 2014. Such policy shall include, but not be limited to, the use of electronic media and other
mechanisms to prevent improper communications between staff members and students.
2. The school board of each school district and the governing body of each charter
school shall, by January 1, 2014, adopt and implement training guidelines and [an annual] a
training program for all school employees who are mandatory reporters of child abuse or
neglect under section 210.115. Such training shall be provided as established in section
168.331.
3. Every school district and the governing body of each charter school shall, by July
1, 2014, include in its teacher and employee training a component that provides up-to-date
and reliable information on identifying signs of sexual abuse in children and danger signals of
potentially abusive relationships between children and adults. The training shall emphasize
the importance of mandatory reporting of abuse under section 210.115 including the
obligation of mandated reporters to report suspected abuse by other mandated reporters, and
how to establish an atmosphere of trust so that students feel their school has concerned adults
with whom they feel comfortable discussing matters related to abuse. Such training shall be
provided as established in section 168.331. The training shall also emphasize that:
(1) All mandatory reporters shall, upon finding reasonable cause, directly and
immediately report suspected child abuse or neglect as provided in section 210.115;
(2) No supervisor or administrator may impede or inhibit any reporting under section
210.115; and
(3) No person making a report under section 210.115 shall be subject to any sanction,
including any adverse employment action, for making such report.
167.625. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Will's Law".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Individualized emergency health care plan", a document developed by a school
nurse, in consultation with a student's parent and other appropriate medical professionals, that
is consistent with the recommendations of the student's health care providers, that describes

HCS HB 2335 16
procedural guidelines that provide specific directions about what to do in a particular
emergency situation, and that is signed by the parent and the school nurse or the school
administrator or the administrator's designee in the absence of the school nurse;
(2) "Individualized health care plan", a document developed by a school nurse, in
consultation with a student's parent and other appropriate medical professionals who may be
providing epilepsy or seizure disorder care to the student, that is consistent with the
recommendations of the student's health care providers, that describes the health services
needed by the student at school, and that is signed by the parent and the school nurse or the
school administrator or the administrator's designee in the absence of the school nurse;
(3) "Parent", a parent, guardian, or other person having charge, control, or custody of
a student;
(4) "School", any public elementary or secondary school or charter school;
(5) "School employee", a person employed by a school;
(6) "Student", a student who has epilepsy or a seizure disorder and who attends a
school.
3. (1) The parent of a student who seeks epilepsy or seizure disorder care while at
school shall inform the school nurse or the school administrator or the administrator's
designee in the absence of the school nurse. The school nurse shall develop an individualized
health care plan and an individualized emergency health care plan for the student. The parent
of the student shall annually provide to the school written authorization for the provision of
epilepsy or seizure disorder care as described in the individualized plans.
(2) The individualized plans developed under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
be updated by the school nurse before the beginning of each school year and as necessary if
there is a change in the health status of the student.
(3) Each individualized health care plan shall, and each individualized emergency
health care plan may, include but not be limited to the following information:
(a) A notice about the student's condition for all school employees who interact with
the student;
(b) Written orders from the student's physician or advanced practice nurse describing
the epilepsy or seizure disorder care;
(c) The symptoms of the epilepsy or seizure disorder for that particular student and
recommended care;
(d) Whether the student may fully participate in exercise and sports, and any
contraindications to exercise or accommodations that shall be made for that particular
student;
(e) Accommodations for school trips, after-school activities, class parties, and other
school-related activities;

HCS HB 2335 17
(f) Information for such school employees about how to recognize and provide care
for epilepsy and seizure disorders, epilepsy and seizure disorder first aid training, when to call
for assistance, emergency contact information, and parent contact information;
(g) Medical and treatment issues that may affect the educational process of the
student;
(h) The student's ability to manage, and the student's level of understanding of, the
student's epilepsy or seizure disorder; and
(i) How to maintain communication with the student, the student's parent and health
care team, the school nurse or the school administrator or the administrator's designee in the
absence of the school nurse, and the school employees.
4. (1) The school nurse assigned to a particular school or the school administrator or
the administrator's designee in the absence of the school nurse shall coordinate the provision
of epilepsy and seizure disorder care at that school and ensure that all school employees are
trained [every two years] in the care of students with epilepsy and seizure disorders including,
but not limited to, school employees working with school-sponsored programs outside of the
regular school day, as provided in the student's individualized plans.
(2) The training required under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include an
online or in-person course of instruction approved by the department of health and senior
services that is provided by a reputable, local, Missouri-based health care or nonprofit
organization that supports the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders.
(3) Such training under this subsection shall be provided as established in
section 168.331.
5. The school nurse or the school administrator, or the administrator's designee in the
absence of the school nurse, shall obtain a release from a student's parent to authorize the
sharing of medical information between the student's physician or advanced practice nurse
and other health care providers. The release shall also authorize the school nurse or the
school administrator, or the administrator's designee in the absence of the school nurse, to
share medical information with other school employees in the school district as necessary. No
sharing of information under this subsection shall be construed to be a violation of the federal
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) (Pub. L. 104-191), as
amended, if a student's parent has provided a release under this subsection.
6. No school employee including, but not limited to, a school nurse, a school bus
driver, a school bus aide, or any other officer or agent of a school shall be held liable for any
good faith act or omission consistent with the provisions of this section, nor shall an action
before the state board of nursing lie against a school nurse for any such action taken by a
school employee trained in good faith by the school nurse under this section. "Good faith"
shall not be construed to include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

HCS HB 2335 18
167.950. 1. (1) By December 31, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop guidelines for the appropriate screening of students for dyslexia and
related disorders and the necessary classroom support for students with dyslexia and related
disorders. Such guidelines shall be consistent with the findings and recommendations of the
task force created under section 633.420.
(2) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, each public school, including
each charter school, shall conduct dyslexia screenings for students in the appropriate year
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
(3) In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the school board of each district
and the governing board of each charter school shall provide reasonable classroom support
consistent with the guidelines developed by the department of elementary and secondary
education.
2. In the 2018-19 school year and subsequent years, the practicing teacher assistance
programs established under section 168.400 shall offer and include two hours of in-service
training provided by each local school district for all practicing teachers in such district
regarding dyslexia and related disorders. Each charter school shall also offer all of its
teachers two hours of training on dyslexia and related disorders. Districts and charter schools
may seek assistance from the department of elementary and secondary education in
developing and providing such training. Completion of such training shall count as two
contact hours of professional development under section 168.021. Such training shall be
provided as established in section 168.331.
3. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Dyslexia", a disorder that is neurological in origin, characterized by difficulties
with accurate and fluent word recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that
typically result from a deficit in the phonological component of language, often unexpected in
relation to other cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction, and of
which secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced
reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.
Nothing in this definition shall require a student with dyslexia to obtain an individualized
education program (IEP) unless the student has otherwise met the federal conditions
necessary;
(2) "Dyslexia screening", a short test conducted by a teacher or school counselor to
determine whether a student likely has dyslexia or a related disorder in which a positive result
does not represent a medical diagnosis but indicates that the student could benefit from
approved support;

HCS HB 2335 19
(3) "Related disorders", disorders similar to or related to dyslexia, such as
developmental auditory imperception, dysphasia, specific developmental dyslexia,
developmental dysgraphia, and developmental spelling disability;
(4) "Support", low-cost and effective best practices, such as oral examinations and
extended test-taking periods, used to support students who have dyslexia or any related
disorder.
4. The state board of education shall promulgate rules and regulations for each public
school to screen students for dyslexia and related disorders and to provide the necessary
classroom support for students with dyslexia and related disorders. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid and void.
5. Nothing in this section shall require the MO HealthNet program to expand the
services that it provides.
168.331. 1. As used in this section, "school employee" means an individual who
works in any paid capacity for a school district or a charter school, such as a
superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, assistant principal, supervising
principal, supervisor, teacher, teacher-secretary, substitute teacher, school nurse, social
worker, school counselor, school psychologist, mental health professional, librarian,
janitor, cafeteria worker, or any other individual employed by such school district or
charter school.
2. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, in the 2026-27 school year
and each subsequent school year, the training, instruction, or education provided to
each school employee of a school district or a charter school under section 160.261,
160.263, 160.485, 160.775, 162.065, 162.069, 167.625, 167.950, 170.047, 170.048, or
170.315, other provisions of state law, or the employing school district's or charter
school's policies shall be provided as follows:
(1) For each newly hired school employee, the employing school district or
charter school shall provide such training, instruction, or education annually in each of
the first three school years after the hiring of such school employee;
(2) For all other school employees, the employing school district or charter
school shall provide such training, instruction, or education on a schedule as determined

HCS HB 2335 20
by such school district or charter school based on the needs of the school district or
charter school, each school employee, or both; and
(3) Each school district and charter school shall provide each school employee
sufficient time during work hours to complete such training, instruction, or education.
3. This section shall not be construed to exempt a school employee from
attending or completing any training, instruction, or education that is required for such
school employee's position or job duties or that is required for such school employee by
federal law.
4. In the 2026-27 school year and each subsequent school year, all new training,
instruction, or education required under state law or rules promulgated by the
department of elementary and secondary education for school employees shall be
mandatory for and provided to each school employee for at least three consecutive
school years before the provisions of subsection 2 of this section apply.
170.047. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Jason Flatt/Avery
Reine Cantor Act".
2. (1) Beginning in the 2017-18 school year and continuing until the end of the 2022-
23 school year, any licensed educator may annually complete up to two hours of training or
professional development in youth suicide awareness and prevention as part of the
professional development hours required for state board of education certification.
(2) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year and continuing in subsequent school years,
the practicing teacher assistance programs established under section 168.400 may offer and
include at least two hours of in-service training provided by each local school district for all
practicing teachers in such district regarding suicide prevention. Each school year, all
teachers, principals, and licensed educators in each district [may] shallattend such training or
complete training on suicide prevention through self-review of suicide prevention materials
as established under section 168.331. Attendance at the training shall count as two contact
hours of professional development under section 168.021 and shall count as two hours of any
other such training required under this section.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall develop guidelines
suitable for training or professional development in youth suicide awareness and prevention.
The department may develop materials that may be used for the training described under
subsection 2 of this section or may offer districts materials developed by a third party that
districts may use for the training. Such training shall be provided as established in section
168.331.
4. For purposes of this section, the term "licensed educator" shall refer to any teacher
with a certificate of license to teach issued by the state board of education or any other

HCS HB 2335 21
educator or administrator required to maintain a professional license issued by the state board
of education.
5. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate rules and
regulations to implement this section.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2016, shall be invalid
and void.
170.048. 1. By July 1, 2018, each district shall adopt a policy for youth suicide
awareness and prevention, including plans for how the district will provide for the training
and education of its district employees. Such training and education shall be provided as
established in section 168.331.
2. Each district's policy shall address and include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Strategies that can help identify students who are at possible risk of suicide;
(2) Strategies and protocols for helping students at possible risk of suicide; and
(3) Protocols for responding to a suicide death.
3. By July 1, 2017, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
develop a model policy that districts may adopt. When developing the model policy, the
department shall cooperate, consult with, and seek input from organizations that have
expertise in youth suicide awareness and prevention. By July 1, 2021, and at least every three
years thereafter, the department shall request information and seek feedback from districts on
their experience with the policy for youth suicide awareness and prevention. The department
shall review this information and may use it to adapt the department's model policy. The
department shall post any information on its website that it has received from districts that it
deems relevant. The department shall not post any confidential information or any
information that personally identifies any student or school employee.
4. (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school that serves any pupils
in grades seven to twelve and that issues pupil identification cards shall have printed on either
side of the cards:
(a) The three-digit dialing code that directs calls and routes text messages to the
Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, 988; and
(b) The nonemergency telephone number of the local police department; and
(c) May have printed on either side of the cards:

HCS HB 2335 22
a. The six-digit dialing code that routes text messages to the Crisis Text Line, 741741;
and
b. The telephone number of a local suicide prevention hotline, if such hotline is
available.
(2) If, on July 1, 2025, a public school or charter school subject to the requirements of
this subsection has a supply of unissued pupil identification cards that do not comply with the
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection, the school shall issue those cards until that
supply is depleted.
(3) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to a pupil identification card issued
for the first time to a pupil and to a card issued to replace a damaged or lost card.
170.315. 1. (1) There is hereby established the "Active Shooter and Intruder
Response Training for Schools Program (ASIRT)".
(2) For each school year ending before July 1, 2026, each school district and charter
school may include in its teacher and school employee training a component on how to
properly respond to students who provide them with information about a threatening situation
and how to address situations in which there is a potentially dangerous or armed intruder in
the school. Training may also include information and techniques on how to address
situations where an active shooter is present in the school or on school property.
(3) For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school shall include in its teacher and school employee training components on:
(a) How to properly respond to students who provide a teacher or school employee
with information about a threatening situation;
(b) How to address situations in which there is a potentially dangerous or armed
intruder in the school;
(c) Information and techniques on how to address situations where an active shooter
is present in the school or on school property;
(d) How to identify potential threats or safety hazards; and
(e) Protocols for emergencies in the school including, but not limited to:
a. Evacuations;
b. Severe weather;
c. Earthquakes;
d. Fire; and
e. Medical.
2. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school [that elects to provide such training] shall conduct the training [on an
annual basis] as established in section 168.331. The length of training shall be determined
by the school district or charter school [electing to provide such training].

HCS HB 2335 23
3. All school personnel may participate in a simulated active shooter and intruder
response drill conducted and led by law enforcement professionals or school safety
professionals. Each drill shall include an explanation of its purpose and a safety briefing.
4. All instructors for the program shall be certified by the department of public
safety's peace officers standards training commission.
5. School districts and charter schools [may] shall consult and collaborate with law
enforcement authorities, emergency response agencies, and other organizations and entities
trained to deal with active shooters or potentially dangerous or armed intruders.
6. Public schools shall actively foster an environment in which students feel
comfortable sharing information they have regarding a potentially threatening or dangerous
situation with a responsible adult. As part of each public school's efforts to actively foster
such environment, each public school shall annually provide age-appropriate information and
training on the Missouri state highway patrol's Courage2ReportMO (C2R) reporting
mechanism or its successor reporting mechanism.
7. For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, each school district
and charter school shall hold an age-appropriate active shooter exercise in which students,
teachers, and other school employees participate in and practice the procedures for safety and
protection to be implemented under such conditions.
✔